Connecticut, session 2026, HB05407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) On or before July first,
2 annually, the assessor of each municipality shall certify to the Secretary
3 of the Office of Policy and Management, on a form furnished by said
4 secretary, the amount of tax revenue which such municipality, except
5 for the provisions of subdivision (83) of section 12-81 of the general
6 statutes, would have received for the assessment year ending
7 immediately preceding. Any municipality which neglects to transmit to
8 said secretary such claim and supporting documentation as required by
9 this section shall forfeit two hundred fifty dollars to the state, provided
10 said secretary may waive such forfeiture in accordance with procedures
11 and standards adopted by regulation in accordance with chapter 54 of
12 the general statutes. Said secretary shall review each such claim as
13 provided in section 12-120b of the general statutes. Any claimant
HB5407 / File No. 148 1

HB5407 File No. 148
14 aggrieved by the results of the secretary's review shall have the rights of
15 appeal as set forth in section 12-120b of the general statutes. The
16 secretary shall, on or before December fifteenth, annually, certify to the
17 Comptroller the amount due each municipality under the provisions of
18 this section, including any modification of such claim made prior to
19 December fifteenth, and the Comptroller shall draw an order on the
20 Treasurer on the fifth business day following and the Treasurer shall
21 pay the amount thereof to such municipality on or before the thirty-first
22 day of December following. If any modification is made as the result of
23 the provisions of this section on or after the December fifteenth
24 following the date on which the assessor has provided the amount of
25 tax revenue in question, any adjustments to the amount due to any
26 municipality for the period for which such modification was made shall
27 be made in the next payment the Treasurer shall make to such
28 municipality pursuant to this section. For the purposes of this section,
29 "municipality" means a town, city, borough, consolidated town and city
30 or consolidated town and borough.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
VA Joint Favorable
HB5407 / File No. 148 2

HB5407 File No. 148
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the General Fund GF - Cost None At Least 20
million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Revenue None See Below
Gain
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the General Fund of at least $20 million
beginning in FY 28 to reimburse municipalities for property tax revenue
lost due to the property tax exemption for veterans with a disability
rating of one hundred percent deemed permanent and total by the U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs1. The bill results in a revenue gain of at
least $20 million to municipalities that have lost revenue because of the
exemption.
Municipalities’ reimbursements will be subject to a $250 forfeiture to
the extent that municipalities do not submit a claim with proper
documentation to the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and the secretary enforces the forfeiture.
1 The total impact will potentially be higher, dependent on the number of qualifying
veterans, the number of spouses of deceased qualifying veterans, and the value of the
property that is being exempted.
HB5407 / File No. 148 3

HB5407 File No. 148
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the amount of property tax revenue
lost as a result of the exemption.
HB5407 / File No. 148 4

HB5407 File No. 148
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5407
AN ACT CONCERNING STATE REIMBURSEMENT TO
MUNICIPALITIES FOR REVENUE LOST DUE TO THE PROPERTY
TAX EXEMPTION FOR VETERANS WITH A ONE HUNDRED PER
CENT PERMANENT AND TOTAL DISABILITY RATING.